Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2810.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 1, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-115.02, to read: START_STATUTE15-115.02. Health education instruction; prohibitions; withholding of state monies; definition A. A public school may not allow an abortion provider or a medical facility or organization that refers patients to an abortion clinic as defined in section 36-449.01 to: 1. Provide health education instruction in the school. 2. Provide health education instructional programs or curricula to the school or school employees. 3. Distribute or display any health education materials or media in the school if the materials or media are created, paid for or donated by the abortion provider or bear an identifying mark of the abortion provider. B. If the department of education determines that a public school is not in compliance with subsection A of this section and if the public school fails to correct the deficiency within ninety days after receiving notice from the department of education, the superintendent of public instruction may withhold any portion of the public school's apportionment of state aid from the date of the determination of noncompliance until the department of education determines that the public school is complying with subsection A of this section. C. For the purposes of this section, "abortion provider" includes any: 1. An abortion clinic as defined in section 36-449.01. 2. Entity that controls, is controlled by or is under common control with an abortion clinic as defined in section 36-449.01. 3. Entity that is a party to a franchising, licensing or similar agreement with an abortion clinic as defined in section 36-449.01. 4. Individual who is acting as an employee or representative of an entity described in paragraph 1, 2 or 3 of this subsection. END_STATUTE